California statutes. Insurance Code
 inadequate, unfairly discriminatory, or otherwise in violation of this chapter, except Sections 1861.01 and 1861.05.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1032, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.14.

Enforcement & Penalties. Violations of this article shall be subject to the penalties set forth in Section 1859.1. In addition to the other penalties provided in this chapter, the commissioner may suspend or revoke, in whole or in part, the certificate of authority of any insurer which fails to comply with the provisions of this article.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 103.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.15.

(a) An insurer issuing policies as described in subdivision (a) of Section 660, shall, as a condition of obtaining and maintaining a certificate of authority to transact the business of insurance in this state, offer to persons who qualify for a good driver discount pursuant to Sections 1861.02 and 1861.025, automobile liability coverage in the minimum financial responsibility coverage amounts specified in subdivision (a) of Section 16056 of the Vehicle Code, and sell that coverage to those
 who request it.

(b) In soliciting the issuance or renewal of a policy of automobile liability insurance, an insurer, broker, agent, or any other employee of the insurer shall disclose to persons eligible for a good driver discount the minimum financial responsibility coverage amounts required pursuant to Section 16056 of the Vehicle Code, and that the insurer is legally required to furnish coverage in those minimum amounts, if requested.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any obligation imposed on any insurer by law to offer and sell any other kind or amount of insurance.

(d) This section does not apply to any insurer that, on November 7, 1988, did not offer to sell a minimum financial responsibility policy as described in subdivision (a) and that did not write more than 1 percent of the private
 passenger automobile liability policies in effect on November 7, 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1185, Sec. 1.   Effective September 24, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

1861.16.

(a) An insurer issuing a policy described in subdivision (a) of Section 660 by or through an insurance agent where a commission is paid, directly or indirectly, to that agent shall, when issuing a policy in the minimum financial responsibility coverage amount as required by Section 1861.15, pay a commission on the
 same terms and on the same percentage basis to that agent as for any higher amount of policy coverage sold by that agent. In no case shall the percentage amount of commission paid to that agent for a policy of minimum financial responsibility coverage be less than the percentage commission paid to that agent on any higher level of policy coverage issued by that insurer.

(b) An agent or representative representing one or more insurers having common ownership or operating in California under common management or control shall offer, and the insurer shall sell, a good driver discount policy to a good driver from an insurer within that common ownership, management, or control group, which offers the lowest rates for that coverage. This requirement applies notwithstanding the underwriting guidelines of any of those insurers or the underwriting guidelines of the common ownership, management, or control group. Nothing in this subdivision shall require
 an insurer to offer and sell a good driver discount policy that the insurer would otherwise not be required to offer and sell in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1861.02. As used in this subdivision, “representative” means any person who offers or prepares premium quotations on behalf of either an insurer or any entity acting directly or indirectly on behalf of an insurer. This subdivision shall not be construed to either permit a representative to transact insurance, or to exempt a representative who does transact insurance from the licensing provisions of this code.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), insurers having common ownership and operating in California under common control are not required to sell good driver discount policies issued by other insurers within the common ownership group if the commissioner determines that the insurers satisfy each of the following conditions:

(A) The business operations of the insurers are independently managed and directed.

(B) The insurers do not jointly develop loss or expense statistics or other data used in ratemaking, or in the preparation of rating systems or rate filings.

(C) The insurers do not jointly maintain or share loss or expense statistics, or other data used in ratemaking or in the preparation of rating systems or rate filings. This condition shall not apply if the data is generally available to the industry through a nonaffiliated third party and is obtained from that third party.

(D) The insurers do not utilize each others’ marketing, sales, or underwriting data.

(E) The insurers act independently of each other
 in determining, filing, and applying base rates, factors, class plans, and underwriting rules, and in the making of insurance policy forms.

(F) The insurers’ sales operations are separate.

(G) The insurers’ marketing operations are separate.

(H) The insurers’ policy service operations are separate.

(2) Notwithstanding Senate Bill 1 of the 2003–04 Regular Session (Chapter 241 of the Statutes of 2003), the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (Public Law 106-102), and the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 and following), the sharing of information between insurers as described in subparagraphs (A) to (H), inclusive, of paragraph (1) shall be more restrictive than may otherwise be permissible pursuant to those acts.

(d) Except to the extent restricted by subdivision (c) or any regulation adopted to implement subdivision (c), this section shall not be interpreted to restrict the right of an insurer or holding company to use aggregate data of its affiliated insurers having common ownership or operating in California under common control.

(e) Nothing in subdivision (c) is intended to amend, alter, or supersede other sections of this code, or other laws of this state, regarding any right of an insurer or holding company to use aggregate data of its affiliated insurers having common ownership or operating in California under common control.

(f) The commissioner may adopt regulations to implement this section.

(g) An insurer that is required by this section or Section
 1861.02 to offer and sell good driver discount policies to good drivers to whom it did not sell those policies prior to November 8, 1988, due to driving safety record or vehicle type may file and, upon the approval of the commissioner, implement an interim rating plan for those applicants until the rating plan required by subdivision (a) of Section 1861.02 is adopted, provided that the insurer has timely filed an automobile insurance rating plan in compliance with subdivision (a) of Section 1861.02, and that plan has not been approved. An insurer may file an interim plan prior to the operative date of subdivision (b).

The commissioner shall notify the public of any application by an insurer for an interim rating plan. The public notice shall meet the requirements of Section 1861.06. The application shall be deemed approved 60 days after public notice unless (1) a consumer or his or her representative requests a hearing within 45 days of public notice and the
 commissioner grants the hearing, or determines not to grant the hearing and issues written findings in support of that decision, or (2) the commissioner on his or her own motion determines to hold a hearing. If the commissioner grants a request for a hearing or determines on his or her own motion to hold a hearing on the application for an interim rating plan, but does not approve or disapprove the proposed interim rating plan within the later of 30 days from the date the commissioner grants a request or determines to hold the hearing or January 1, 1991, the interim rating plan may be used until the time that the commissioner issues a decision.

If an interim rate or proposed interim rate is greater than the rate ultimately approved, the insurer shall refund to its applicable policyholders, in proportion to the amount of premium paid by each, the difference between the total amount earned and the amount to which the insurer is entitled under the rate ultimately
 approved, together with interest at the rate of 10 percent per year. In lieu of a refund, the insurer may provide a credit to the policyholder if the amount due is less than three dollars ($3).

(h) Nothing contained in subdivision (b) or (c) shall be construed to expand, limit, or modify the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 1861.02.

(i) A violation of this section by any insurer shall subject it to the penalties provided by Section 1861.14.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 787, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Child Care Insurance Act [1862. - 1864.]

1862.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to assure the availability, stability, and affordability of liability insurance for operators of day care in this state, and to provide the residents of this state an adequate, safe, affordable, and plentiful market of day care services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1362, Sec. 3.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

1863.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner of this state.

(b) “Net direct premiums” means gross direct premiums written on liability insurance in this state, including the liability portion of the multiperil policies and of automobile insurance policies, less return premiums and any surplus premium deposits. “Net direct premiums” shall not mean any reinsurance premiums or premiums for ocean marine insurance.

(c) “Insurer” means any person who undertakes to indemnify another against loss, damage, or liability arising from a contingent or unknown event, and shall include reciprocals and interinsurance exchanges.

(d) “Family day care provider” means those persons licensed pursuant to Section 1596.78 or 1596.79 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1362, Sec. 3.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

1864.

(a) Each insurer engaged in writing child care liability insurance coverage in this state shall submit to the commissioner a report of its operations regarding child care liability claims experience for the last preceding calendar year at the request of the commissioner, but not more than annually, on a form prescribed by the commissioner. Each report shall separately state the following information for family day care homes, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code, and licensed child care centers, as defined in Section 1596.76 of the Health and Safety Code:

(1) Premiums earned.

(2) Premiums
 written.

(3) Number of claims.

(4) Number of new claims during the reporting period.

(5) Number of claims closed during the reporting period.

(6) Number of claims outstanding at the end of the reporting period.

(7) Total losses incurred.

(8) Total losses incurred as a percentage of premiums earned.

(9) Total number of policies in force on the last day of the reporting period.

(10) Total number of policies canceled.

(11) Total number
 of policies nonrenewed.

(12) Net underwriting gain or loss.

(13) Separate allocations of expenses for commissions, other acquisition costs, general office expenses, taxes, licenses and fees, and other expenses. The allocations required by this section shall be made by dividing the company’s total premiums earned for child care liability insurance by its total premiums earned and applying the ratio determined to the expenses reported in the company’s annual statement filed with the commissioner pursuant to Section 900.

(b) The commissioner shall develop and issue reporting forms to insurers at least 90 days prior to the due date of the reports required pursuant to this section.

(c) The Legislature finds that it is in the public interest of the
 policyholders of this state that insurers writing child care liability insurance permit remittance of premiums to occur on an installment basis.

(d) The information provided under this section pertaining to a specified claim, insurance policy, or insurer shall be confidential and shall only be revealed by the department on a nonspecific basis as part of an aggregate report of claims or policies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 39.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.5. Risk Retention [1870. - 1870.]

1870.

The Legislature finds and declares that for the purpose of creating a risk retention group, directors and officers of corporations, whether for profit or nonprofit, are engaged in the same line of business with respect to the liability risks faced by those officers and directors within the meaning of the federal Liability Risk Retention Act of 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 559, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. The Insurance Frauds Prevention Act [1871. - 1879.8.]



  ARTICLE 1. False and Fraudulent Claims [1871. - 1871.10.]

1871.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) The business of insurance involves many transactions that have the potential for abuse and illegal activities. There are numerous law enforcement agencies on the state and local levels charged with the responsibility for investigating and prosecuting fraudulent activity. This chapter is intended to permit the full utilization of the expertise of the commissioner and the department so that they may more effectively investigate and discover insurance frauds, halt fraudulent activities, and assist and receive assistance from federal, state, local, and administrative law enforcement agencies in the prosecution of persons who are parties in insurance frauds.

(b) Insurance fraud is a particular problem for automobile policyholders; fraudulent activities account for 15 to 20 percent of all auto insurance payments. Automobile insurance fraud is the biggest and fastest growing segment of insurance fraud and contributes substantially to the high cost of automobile insurance with particular significance in urban areas.

(c) Prevention of automobile insurance fraud will significantly reduce the incidence of severity and automobile insurance claim payments and will therefore produce a commensurate reduction in automobile insurance premiums.

(d) Workers’ compensation fraud harms employers by contributing to the increasingly high cost of workers’ compensation insurance and self-insurance and harms employees by undermining the perceived legitimacy of all workers’ compensation claims.

(e) Prevention of workers’ compensation insurance fraud may reduce the number of workers’ compensation claims and claim payments thereby producing a commensurate reduction in workers’ compensation costs. Prevention of workers’ compensation insurance fraud will assist in restoring confidence and faith in the workers’ compensation system, and will facilitate expedient and full compensation for employees injured at the workplace.

(f) The actions of employers who fraudulently underreport payroll or fail to report payroll for all employees to their insurance company in order to pay a lower workers’ compensation premium result in significant additional premium costs and an unfair burden to honest employers and their employees.

(g) The actions of employers who fraudulently fail to secure the payment of workers’ compensation as required by Section 3700 of the Labor Code harm employees, cause unfair competition for honest employers, and increase costs to taxpayers.

(h) Health insurance fraud is a particular problem for health insurance policyholders. Although there are no precise figures, it is believed that fraudulent activities account for billions of dollars annually in added health care costs nationally. Health care fraud causes losses in premium dollars and increases health care costs unnecessarily.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 2.5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1871.1.

Insurers and their agents, while they are investigating suspected fraud claims, shall have access to all relevant public records that are required to be open for inspection under Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code, and any regulations thereunder. This section restates existing law, and the Legislature does not intend to grant insurers or their agents access to public records other than to those public records available to them under existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 307.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

1871.2.

(a) An insurer who, in connection with any insurance application, contract, or provision of contract, prints, reproduces, or furnishes a form to any person upon which that person applies for a policy, seeks to amend insurance coverage, or furnishes information relating to underwriting criteria affecting premium or eligibility for coverage, under an existing policy, or gives notice of a claim to the insurer or makes a claim against the insurer by reason of accident, injury, death, or other noticed or claimed loss, shall cause to be printed or displayed in comparative prominence with other content on the form, exclusive of schedules attached to the form, or an endorsement separate from the form, the statement: “Any person who knowingly presents false or fraudulent information to obtain or amend insurance coverage or to make a
 claim for the payment of a loss is guilty of a crime and may be subject to fines and confinement in state prison.” This statement shall be preceded by the words: “For your protection California law requires the following to appear on this form” or other explanatory words of similar meaning.

(b) This section is not applicable to a contract of reinsurance as defined in Section 620.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 217, Sec. 1.   (SB 743)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1871.3.

(a) In the case of any claim arising from the theft of an insured vehicle, prior to the settlement of the claim, the insurer shall secure from the insured a claim form which shall contain, among other things, the following:

(1) A warning that false representations made on the signed claim form by the insured subject the insured to a penalty of perjury. 

(2) A detailed description of the insured vehicle including the interior, exterior, and any special equipment. 

(3) The purchase location of the insured vehicle, the purchase date, and the name of the seller. 

(4) A detailed statement of the circumstances surrounding the theft. 

(5) The current driver’s license number of the insured, except where the vehicle is owned by a person that is not a natural person, or the claimant is a financial institution and the vehicle is insured pursuant to an insurance policy issued to the financial institution to protect vehicles that are collateral securing any loan made by the financial institution. A financial institution shall provide, to the extent it has the information, the current driver’s license number of the registered owner of the vehicle or the debtor who has obtained the loan. 

(b) For purposes of complying with the requirements of subdivision (a), the insured shall do either of the following:

(1) Sign the claim form in the presence of the insurance agent, broker, adjuster, or other claims representative, who shall verify the driver’s license number of the insured who is signing the claim form. 

(2) Submit a claim form with a notarized signature.

(c) The claim form shall be signed under penalty of perjury. 

(d) The insurer shall retain the following for at least three years:

(1) All settlement checks in settlement of the theft of an automobile, or an electronic copy thereof.

(2) The original claim form provided for in subdivision (a), or an electronic copy thereof.

(3) A legible copy of the police report of the vehicle theft, or an electronic copy thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 93, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1871.4.

(a) It is unlawful to do any of the following:

(1) Make or cause to be made a knowingly false or fraudulent material statement or material representation for the purpose of obtaining or denying any compensation, as defined in Section 3207 of the Labor Code.

(2) Present or cause to be presented a knowingly false or fraudulent written or oral material statement in support of, or in opposition to, a claim for compensation for the purpose of obtaining or denying any compensation, as defined in Section 3207 of the Labor Code.

(3) Knowingly assist, abet,
 conspire with, or solicit a person in an unlawful act under this section.

(4) Make or cause to be made a knowingly false or fraudulent statement with regard to entitlement to benefits with the intent to discourage an injured worker from claiming benefits or pursuing a claim.

For the purposes of this subdivision, “statement” includes, but is not limited to, a notice, proof of injury, bill for services, payment for services, hospital or doctor records, X-ray, test results, medical-legal expense as defined in Section 4620 of the Labor Code, other evidence of loss, injury, or expense, or payment.

(5) Make or cause to be made a knowingly false or fraudulent material statement or material representation for the purpose of obtaining or denying any of the benefits or reimbursement provided in the Return-to-Work Program established under Section
 139.48 of the Labor Code.

(6) Make or cause to be made a knowingly false or fraudulent material statement or material representation for the purpose of discouraging an employer from claiming any of the benefits or reimbursement provided in the Return-to-Work Program established under Section 139.48 of the Labor Code.

(b) Every person who violates subdivision (a) shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for one year, or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, for two, three, or five years, or by a fine not exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) or double the value of the fraud, whichever is greater, or by both that imprisonment and fine. Restitution shall be ordered, including restitution for any medical evaluation or treatment services obtained or provided. The court shall determine the amount of restitution and the person or
 persons to whom the restitution shall be paid. A person convicted under this section may be charged the costs of investigation at the discretion of the court.

(c) A person who violates subdivision (a) and who has a prior felony conviction of that subdivision, of former Section 556, of former Section 1871.1, or of Section 548 or 550 of the Penal Code, shall receive a two-year enhancement for each prior conviction in addition to the sentence provided in subdivision (b).

The existence of any fact that would subject a person to a penalty enhancement shall be alleged in the information or indictment and either admitted by the defendant in open court, or found to be true by the jury trying the issue of guilt or by the court where guilt is established by plea of guilty or nolo contendere or by trial by the court sitting without a jury.

(d) This
 section may not be construed to preclude the applicability of any other provision of criminal law that applies or may apply to a transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 212.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1871.5.

Any person convicted of workers’ compensation fraud pursuant to Section 1871.4 or Section 550 of the Penal Code shall be ineligible to receive or retain any compensation, as defined in Section 3207 of the Labor Code, where that compensation was owed or received as a result of a violation of Section 1871.4 or Section 550 of the Penal Code for which the recipient of the compensation was convicted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 120, Sec. 3.1.   Effective July 16, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1871.6.

The provisions of Section 781 of the Penal Code are applicable to any prosecutions for violations of Section 1871.4. This section is declaratory of existing law and shall not be interpreted to limit the applicability of Section 781 of the Penal Code to any other criminal provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 120, Sec. 3.2.   Effective July 16, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1871.7.

(a) It is unlawful to knowingly employ runners, cappers, steerers, or other persons to procure clients or patients to perform or obtain services or benefits pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code or to procure clients or patients to perform or obtain services or benefits under a contract of insurance or that will be the basis for a claim against an insured individual or their insurer.

(b) Every person who violates any provision of this section or Section 549, 550, or 551 of the Penal Code shall be subject, in addition to any other penalties that may be prescribed by law, to a civil penalty of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), plus an assessment of not more than three times the
 amount of each claim for compensation, as defined in Section 3207 of the Labor Code or pursuant to a contract of insurance. The court shall have the power to grant other equitable relief, including temporary injunctive relief, as is necessary to prevent the transfer, concealment, or dissipation of illegal proceeds, or to protect the public. The penalty prescribed in this paragraph shall be assessed for each fraudulent claim presented to an insurance company by a defendant and not for each violation.

(c) The penalties set forth in subdivision (b) are intended to be remedial rather than punitive, and shall not preclude, nor be precluded by, a criminal prosecution for the same conduct. If the court finds, after considering the goals of disgorging unlawful profit, restitution, compensating the state for the costs of investigation and prosecution, and alleviating the social costs of increased insurance rates due to fraud, that such a penalty would
 be punitive and would preclude, or be precluded by, a criminal prosecution, the court shall reduce that penalty appropriately.

(d) The district attorney or commissioner may bring a civil action under this section. Before the commissioner may bring that action, the commissioner shall be required to present the evidence obtained to the appropriate local district attorney for possible criminal or civil filing. If the district attorney elects not to pursue the matter, then the commissioner may proceed with the action.

(e) (1) Any interested persons, including an insurer, may bring a civil action for a violation of this section for the person and for the State of California. The action shall be brought in the name of the state. The action may be dismissed only if the court and the district attorney or the commissioner, whichever is participating, give written
 consent to the dismissal.

(2) A copy of the complaint and written disclosure of substantially all material evidence and information the person possesses shall be served on the district attorney and commissioner. The complaint shall be filed in camera, shall remain under seal for at least 60 days from the date of service on the district attorney and commissioner, and shall not be served on the defendant until the court so orders. The local district attorney or commissioner may elect to intervene and proceed with the action within 60 days after the district attorney or commissioner receives both the complaint and the material evidence and information. If more than one governmental entity elects to intervene, the district attorney shall have precedence.

(3) The district attorney or commissioner may, for good cause shown, move the court for extensions of the time during which the
 complaint remains under seal under paragraph (2). The motions may be supported by affidavits or other submissions in camera. The defendant shall not be required to respond to any complaint filed under this section until 20 days after the complaint is unsealed and served upon the defendant.

(4) Before the expiration of the 60-day period or any extensions obtained under paragraph (3), the district attorney or commissioner shall either:

(A) Proceed with the action, in which case the action shall be conducted by the district attorney or commissioner.

(B) Notify the court that it declines to take over the action, in which case the person bringing the action shall have the right to conduct the action.

(5) When a person or governmental agency brings an action
 under this section, no person other than the district attorney or commissioner may intervene or bring a related action based on the facts underlying the pending action unless that action is authorized by another statute or common law.

(f) (1) If the district attorney or commissioner proceeds with the action, the district attorney or commissioner shall have the primary responsibility for prosecuting the action, and shall not be bound by an act of the person bringing the action. That person shall have the right to continue as a party to the action, subject to the limitations set forth in paragraph (2).

(2) (A) The district attorney or commissioner may dismiss the action notwithstanding the objections of the person initiating the action if the person has been notified by the district attorney or commissioner of the filing of the motion, and
 the court has provided the person with an opportunity for a hearing on the motion.

(B) The district attorney or commissioner may settle the action with the defendant notwithstanding the objections of the person initiating the action if the court determines, after a hearing, that the proposed settlement is fair, adequate, and reasonable under all the circumstances. Upon a showing of good cause, the hearing may be held in camera.

(C) Upon a showing by the district attorney or commissioner that unrestricted participation during the course of the litigation by the person initiating the action would interfere with or unduly delay the district attorney’s or commissioner’s prosecution of the case, or would be repetitious, irrelevant, or for purposes of harassment, the court may, in its discretion, impose limitations on the person’s participation, including, but not limited to, the
 following:

(i) Limiting the number of witnesses the person may call.

(ii) Limiting the length of the testimony of those witnesses.

(iii) Limiting the person’s cross-examination of witnesses.

(iv) Otherwise limiting the participation by the person in the litigation.

(D) Upon a showing by the defendant that unrestricted participation during the course of the litigation by the person initiating the action would be for purposes of harassment or would cause the defendant undue burden or unnecessary expense, the court may limit the participation by the person in the litigation.

(3) If the district attorney or commissioner elects
 not to proceed with the action, the person who initiated the action shall have the right to conduct the action. If the district attorney or commissioner so requests, the district attorney or commissioner shall be served with copies of all pleadings filed in the action and shall be supplied with copies of all deposition transcripts, at the district attorney’s or commissioner’s expense. When a person proceeds with the action, the court, without limiting the status and rights of the person initiating the action, may nevertheless permit the district attorney or commissioner to intervene at a later date upon a showing of good cause.

(4) If at any time both a civil action for penalties and equitable relief pursuant to this section and a criminal action are pending against a defendant for substantially the same conduct, whether brought by the government or a private party, the civil action shall be stayed until the criminal action has been concluded
 at the trial court level. The stay shall not preclude the court from granting or enforcing temporary equitable relief during the pendency of the actions. Whether or not the district attorney or commissioner proceeds with the action, upon a showing by the district attorney or commissioner that certain actions of discovery by the person initiating the action would interfere with a law enforcement or governmental agency investigation or prosecution of a criminal or civil matter arising out of the same facts, the court may stay discovery for a period of not more than 180 days. A hearing on a request for the stay shall be conducted in camera. The court may extend the 180-day period upon a further showing in camera that the agency has pursued the criminal or civil investigation or proceedings with reasonable diligence and any proposed discovery in the civil action will interfere with the ongoing criminal or civil investigation or proceedings.

(5) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), the district attorney or commissioner may elect to pursue its claim through any alternate remedy available to the district attorney or commissioner.

(g) (1) (A) (i) If the district attorney proceeds with an action brought by a person under subdivision (e), that person shall, subject to subparagraph (B), receive at least 30 percent but not more than 40 percent of the proceeds of the action or settlement of the claim, depending upon the extent to which the person substantially contributed to the prosecution of the action.

(ii) If the commissioner has brought an action or has proceeded with an action brought by another person under this section on or after January 1, 2006, the commissioner shall be entitled to attorney’s fees and costs in addition to any judgment,
 regardless of the date that judgment is entered. The court shall determine and award the commissioner the amount of reasonable attorney’s fees, including, but not limited to, reasonable fees for time expended by attorneys employed by the department and for costs incurred. Any attorney’s fees or costs awarded to the commissioner and collected shall be deposited in the Insurance Fund. In cases in which the commissioner has intervened, the commissioner and the person bringing the claim may stipulate to an allocation. The court may allocate the funds pursuant to the stipulation if, after the court’s ruling on objection by the district attorney, if any, the court finds it is in the interests of justice to follow the stipulation.

(iii) If the commissioner has proceeded with an action, if there is no stipulation regarding allocation, and if a judgment has been obtained or a settlement has been reached with the defendants, the court shall determine the
 allocation, upon motion of the commissioner or the person bringing the action, according to the following priority:

(I) The person bringing the action, regardless of whether that person paid money to the defendants as part of the acts alleged in the complaint, shall first receive the amount the court determines is reasonable for attorney’s fees, costs, and expenses that the court determines to have been necessarily incurred.

(II) The commissioner shall receive the amount the court determines for reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(III) If the person bringing the suit has paid moneys to the defendants as part of the acts alleged in the complaint, that person shall receive the amount paid to the defendants.

(IV) At least 30 percent, but not more than
 40 percent, of the remaining assets or moneys, shall be allocated to the person bringing the action, depending upon the extent to which the person substantially contributed to the prosecution of the action.

(iv) Those portions of a judgment or settlement not distributed pursuant to this subdivision shall be paid to the General Fund of the state and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be apportioned between the Department of Justice and the Department of Insurance for enhanced fraud investigation and prevention efforts.

(B) Where the action is one that the court finds to be based primarily on disclosures of specific information, other than information provided by the person bringing the action, relating to allegations or transactions in a criminal, civil, or administrative hearing, in a legislative or administrative report, hearing, audit, or investigation, or from the
 news media, the court may award those sums that it considers appropriate, but in no case more than 10 percent of the proceeds, taking into account the significance of the information and the role of the person bringing the action in advancing the case to litigation.

(C) Any payment to a person under subparagraph (A) or under subparagraph (B) shall be made from the proceeds. The person shall also receive an amount for reasonable expenses that the court finds to have been necessarily incurred, plus reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. All of those expenses, fees, and costs shall be awarded against the defendant.

(2) (A) If the district attorney or commissioner does not proceed with an action under this section, the person bringing the action or settling the claim shall receive an amount that the court decides is reasonable for collecting the civil penalty and
 damages. Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the amount shall not be less than 40 percent and not more than 50 percent of the proceeds of the action or settlement and shall be paid out of the proceeds. That person shall also receive an amount for reasonable expenses that the court finds to have been necessarily incurred, plus reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. All of those attorney’s fees and costs shall be imposed against the defendant. The parties shall serve the commissioner and the local district attorney with complete copies of any and all settlement agreements, and terms and conditions, for actions brought under this article at least 10 days prior to filing any motion for allocation with the court under this paragraph. The court may allocate the funds pursuant to the settlement agreement if, after the court’s ruling on objection by the commissioner or the local district attorney, if any, the court finds it is in the interests of justice to follow the settlement agreement.

(B) If the person bringing the action, as a result of a violation of this section has paid money to the defendant or to an attorney acting on behalf of the defendant in the underlying claim, then the person shall be entitled to up to double the amount paid to the defendant or the attorney if that amount is greater than 50 percent of the proceeds. That person shall also receive an amount for reasonable expenses that the court finds to have been necessarily incurred, plus reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. All of those expenses, fees, and costs shall be awarded against the defendant.
